Washington statutes.
RCW 9.82.010

Defined—Penalty.

(1) Treason against the people of the state consists in—

(a) Levying war against the people of the state, or

(b) Adhering to its enemies, or

(c) Giving them aid and comfort.

(2) Treason is a class A felony and punishable by death.

(3) No person shall be convicted for treason unless upon the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act or by confession in open court.

[ 2003 c 53 s 46; 1909 c 249 s 65; RRS s 2317.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Treason defined and evidence required: State Constitution Art. 1 s 27.